Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-645
Park or parking, defined.

Park or parking shall mean the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading merchandise or passengers.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 141.